Tennessee, session 114, SB1027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-907, is amended by deleting the
first sentence and substituting:
By October 15 of each year, the department of education shall annually submit
an early grades reading report for the immediately preceding school year to the
education committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives
having jurisdiction over education.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1027
002912
- 1 -